Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 12. PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT

CHAPTER 379. NORTH AMERICAN FREE TRADE AGREEMENT IMPACT ZONE

Sec. 379.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "zone" means a North American Free Trade Agreement impact zone created by a municipality under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1150, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 379.002. CREATION OF ZONE. A municipality may create a zone covering a part of the municipality if the municipality determines the creation of the zone would promote:

(1) business opportunities for local businesses in the zone;

(2) an increase in economic development in the zone; or

(3) employment opportunities for residents of the zone.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1150, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 379.003. ADOPTION OF ZONE. (a) A municipality may create a zone if the governing body of the municipality adopts a resolution containing:

(1) the determination described by Section 379.002;

(2) a description of the boundaries of the zone; and

(3) a finding by the governing body that the creation of the zone satisfies the requirements of Section 312.202, Tax Code.

(b) A municipality may create more than one zone and may include an area in more than one zone.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1150, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 379.004. ADDITIONAL POWERS. A municipality may:

(1) waive or adopt fees related to the construction of buildings in the zone, including fees related to the inspection of buildings and impact fees;

(2) enter into agreements, for a period of not more than 10 years, for the purpose of benefiting the zone, for sales tax refunds or abatements of municipal sales tax on sales made in the zone;

(3) enter into agreements abating municipal property taxes on property in the zone subject to the duration limits of Section 312.204, Tax Code; and

(4) set baseline performance standards, such as the Energy Star Program as developed by the Department of Energy, to encourage the use of alternative building materials that address concerns relating to the environment or to building costs, maintenance, or energy consumption.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1150, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 379.005. NAFTA DISPLACED WORKERS. (a) A business that operates in a zone and receives benefits as a result of a municipality's action under Section 379.004(1), (2), or (3) shall make a good faith effort to hire individuals receiving NAFTA transitional adjustment assistance under 19 U.S.C. Section 2331.

(b) A business described by Subsection (a) shall annually report to the governing body of the municipality on what percentage of the total number of individuals hired by the business during the year covered by the report is comprised of individuals described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1150, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.